North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 7. Methamphetamine Watch Program.

§ 114-43.
Methamphetamine Watch Program — good faith actions immune from civil and criminal liability.

Anyone who, in good faith, does any of the acts listed in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this section as part of a Methamphetamine Watch Program approved by the Department of Justice is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed for that action. In any proceeding involving liability, good faith is presumed. The actions for which immunity is granted under this section are as follows:

The person files a report with a law enforcement agency concerning the purchase or theft of ingredients used to manufacture methamphetamine.

The person cooperates in any law enforcement investigation concerning the manufacture of methamphetamine.

The person testifies in any judicial proceeding concerning the manufacture of methamphetamine.

History.

2004-178, s. 9.

§§ 114-44 through 114-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.